Utah statutes.
31A-5-202.   Incorporators.

(1)  One or more adult natural persons may organize and act as incorporators of a corporation under Section 31A-5-204.

(2)  One to 15 adult natural persons may organize and act as incorporators of a corporation under the accelerated organization procedure of Section 31A-5-213.

(3)  This section does not apply to stock and mutual insurance corporations already in existence on July 1, 1986.



Amended by Chapter 71, 2002 General Session

